New York, session 2025-2026, A4641.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The article heading of article 27 of the environmental 2 conservation law is amended to read as follows: 3 REDUCTION, COLLECTION, REUSE, RECYCLING, 4 TREATMENT AND DISPOSAL OF [REFUSE AND OTHER] SOLID WASTE 5 § 2. The title heading of title 18 of article 27 of the environmental 6 conservation law, as added by chapter 562 of the laws of 2010, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 EXTENDED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY FOR 9 RECHARGEABLE [BATTERY RECYCLING] BATTERIES EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00126-03-5 A. 4641--A 2 1 § 3. Section 27-1801 of the environmental conservation law, as added 2 by chapter 562 of the laws of 2010, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 27-1801. Short title. 4 This title shall be known as and may be cited as the "[New York State] 5 Extended Producer Responsibility Law for Rechargeable [Battery Law] 6 Batteries". 7 § 4. Subdivision 4 of section 27-1803 of the environmental conserva- 8 tion law, as added by chapter 562 of the laws of 2010, is amended and a 9 new subdivision 7 is added to read as follows: 10 4. "rechargeable battery" means any rechargeable: (i) nickel-cadmium, 11 sealed lead, lithium ion, nickel metal hydride battery[,]; (ii) battery 12 used as the principal electric power source for an electric scooter or 13 bicycle with electric assist; or (iii) any other such dry cell battery 14 capable of being recharged weighing less than [twenty-five] fifty 15 pounds, or battery packs containing such batteries; (iv) but shall not 16 include a battery used as the principal electric power source for a 17 vehicle, such as, but not limited to, an automobile, boat, truck, trac- 18 tor, golf cart or wheelchair; for storage of electricity generated by an 19 alternative power source, such as solar or wind-driven generators; or 20 for memory backup that is an integral component of an electronic device; 21 7. "sell" or "sale" means any transfer for consideration of title or 22 the right to use, from a manufacturer or retailer to a person, includ- 23 ing, but not limited to, transactions conducted through retail sales 24 outlets, catalogs, mail, the telephone, the internet, or any electronic 25 means; "sell" or "sale" shall not include samples, donations, and reuse. 26 § 5. Paragraphs a and d of subdivision 1 of section 27-1807 of the 27 environmental conservation law, as added by chapter 562 of the laws of 28 2010, are amended to read as follows: 29 a. Retailers having a place of business in the state shall accept from 30 consumers at any time during normal business hours rechargeable 31 batteries of a similar shape, size [and shape], and function as the 32 retailer offers for sale. Retailers shall take up to ten such batteries 33 per day from any person regardless of whether such person purchases 34 replacement batteries, and retailers shall also accept as many such 35 batteries as a consumer purchases from the retailer. Retailers shall 36 conspicuously post and maintain, at or near the point of entry to the 37 place of business, a legible sign, not less than eight and one-half 38 inches by eleven inches in size, stating that used rechargeable 39 batteries of the size and shape sold or offered for sale by the retailer 40 may not enter the solid waste stream, and that the retail establishment 41 is a collection site for recycling such batteries. Such sign shall state 42 the following in letters at least one inch in height: "It is illegal to 43 dispose of rechargeable batteries in the state of New York as solid 44 waste. We accept used rechargeable batteries for return to the manufac- 45 turer." 46 d. Retailers may not sell or offer for sale to consumers in the state 47 rechargeable batteries unless the battery manufacturer is operating in 48 accordance with a collection, transportation, and recycling plan 49 approved by the commissioner. The commissioner shall maintain on the 50 department's website a list of manufacturers operating in accordance 51 with approved plans, and the brands covered by such manufacturer's 52 plans. 53 e. Retailers must be in compliance with the provisions of this subdi- 54 vision no later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of 55 this title or, with respect to a rechargeable battery defined in para- 56 graph (ii) of subdivision four of section 27-1803 of this title, and A. 4641--A 3 1 with respect to the requirements of paragraph d of this subdivision one 2 year after the effective date of the chapter of the laws of two thousand 3 twenty-five which amended this title, or when the commissioner has 4 approved a new or updated plan in compliance with such chapter, whichev- 5 er is later. 6 § 6. Paragraphs a and b of subdivision 2 of section 27-1807 of the 7 environmental conservation law, as added by chapter 562 of the laws of 8 2010, are amended to read as follows: 9 a. Within ninety days of the effective date of this title or, with 10 respect to rechargeable batteries defined in paragraph (ii) of subdivi- 11 sion four of section 27-1803 of this title, within one hundred eighty 12 days of the effective date of the chapter of the laws of two thousand 13 twenty-five that amended such paragraph, submittance to the commissioner 14 of a new or updated plan that identifies the methods by which battery 15 manufacturers will safely collect, transport, and recycle rechargeable 16 batteries collected by retailers at the expense of the battery manufac- 17 turer and provide retailers with information on the safe handling and 18 storage of rechargeable batteries. 19 b. Submittance to the department of annual reports, on a form 20 prescribed by the department, concerning the amount of rechargeable 21 batteries received within the state and recycled either by number or by 22 weight, including the weight of rechargeable batteries defined in para- 23 graph (ii) of subdivision four of section 27-1803 of this title received 24 within the state as well as within a city with a population of one 25 million or more; the costs of such efforts; and any other relevant 26 information as required by the department. 27 § 7. Subdivision 2 of section 27-1807 of the environmental conserva- 28 tion law is amended by adding a new paragraph d and a new subdivision 29 2-a is added to read as follows: 30 d. Providing for the safe and prompt collection and disposal of 31 batteries from electric scooters or bicycles with electric assist 32 collected by retailers and by government agencies. 33 2-a. A battery manufacturer may not sell, offer for sale, or distrib- 34 ute rechargeable batteries in the state unless the battery manufacturer 35 is implementing or participating under an approved plan in accordance 36 with this section. 37 § 8. Section 27-1807 of the environmental conservation law is amended 38 by adding a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 39 6. The department shall, after consultation with the office of fire 40 prevention and control in the division of homeland security and emergen- 41 cy services and the fire department of the city of New York, within one 42 hundred eighty days of the effective date of the chapter of the laws of 43 two thousand twenty-five that added this subdivision, promulgate rules 44 and regulations to ensure the safe storage of rechargeable batteries 45 that minimizes the risk of fires. Such rules and regulations shall also, 46 at a minimum, require retailers to: 47 a. coordinate with a battery manufacturer, or any combination of 48 battery manufacturers working together, to regularly remove batteries 49 from the retail location; and 50 b. inform all employees who handle or have responsibility for managing 51 batteries about proper handling and emergency procedures, including fire 52 related hazards, appropriate to the type or types of battery handled by 53 the retailer. 54 § 9. Section 27-1809 of the environmental conservation law is amended 55 by adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: A. 4641--A 4 1 5. In a city with a population of one million or more, such city 2 shall, in addition to any authority otherwise conferred in this chapter, 3 have concurrent authority to enforce, by an agency or agencies 4 designated for such purpose by the mayor of such city, the provisions of 5 section 27-1805 and subdivision one of section 27-1807 of this title. 6 Any notice of violation issued by an agency designated by the mayor of 7 such city charging a violation of section 27-1805 and subdivision one of 8 section 27-1807 of this title shall be returnable to the environmental 9 control board of such city. Such environmental control board shall have 10 the power to impose the civil penalties set forth in subdivisions one, 11 two and three of this section. All civil penalties collected for any 12 violation of this title that have been imposed by the environmental 13 control board of such city shall be paid into the general fund of such 14 city. 15 § 10. Section 27-1811 of the environmental conservation law, as added 16 by chapter 562 of the laws of 2010, is amended to read as follows: 17 § 27-1811. State preemption. 18 Jurisdiction in all matters pertaining to rechargeable battery recycl- 19 ing is, by this title, vested exclusively in the state. Any provision of 20 any local law or ordinance, or any rule or regulation promulgated there- 21 to, governing rechargeable battery recycling shall, upon the effective 22 date of section 27-1805 of this title, be preempted; provided, however, 23 that nothing in this section shall preclude a person from coordinating, 24 for recycling or reuse, the collection of rechargeable batteries and 25 provided, further, however, that nothing in this section shall preclude 26 the enforcement of this title pursuant to subdivision five of section 27 27-1809 of this title. 28 § 11. This act shall take effect immediately.